src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON IV_PASSIVE_L  !!≈ * **@CODE@** - Passive of intransitive verbs => impersonate verbs, like "dïjvelduvvieh" = "(de sakene) ble diskutert", from "dïjveldidh" = "diskutere" (IV), only used in 3rd person Sg and Pl.
                          +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%>%^3sUMLa               FINAL1    ;
                          +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Uml:%^3dUMLieh               FINAL1    ; ! Skal bli "dïjvelduvvieh", men blir "dïjveldovvieh"
                              +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i                      FINAL1    ;
                     +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPi              FINAL1    ;
                              +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>in                     FINAL1    ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
                                      +V+IV+Inf:%>edh                    FINAL1    ;
                                     +V+IV+VGen:%>en                     FINAL1    ;
! +V+Act:%>eme      FINAL1 ;
                                      +V+IV+Ger:%>eminie                 FINAL1    ;
! +V+PrsPrc:%>ije   FINAL1 ;
! +V+PrsPrc:%>ijes   FINAL1 ;
                                   +V+IV+PrfPrc:%>eme                    flagFINAL1    ;
                                   +V+IV+ConNeg:%>0h                     FINAL1    ;
! Derivations
! -----------
                            +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»em                     flagNomActOdd ;
           +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Uml+Sg3:%»egået%>%^1UMLa         FINAL1        ;
           +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3:%»egået%>%^iUMLi         FINAL1        ;
  +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»egået%>%^iUML%^DISIMPi FINAL1        ;
               +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%»egået%>ieX2h           FINAL1        ;
           +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Uml+Pl3:%»egået%>%^iUMLin        FINAL1        ;
                       +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Inf:%»egået%>edh             FINAL1        ;
                    +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+ConNeg:%»egået%>ieh             FINAL1        ;
                      +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+VGen:%»egået%>ien             FINAL1        ;
!                      +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Act:%»egået%>eme             FINAL1        ;
                       +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ger:%»egået%>ieminie         FINAL1        ;
                +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+PrfPrc+Uml:%»egået%>%^1UMLeme       FINAL1        ;
           +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»ijahtj%>%^3sUMLa       FINAL1        ;
           +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Uml:%»ijahtj%>%^3dUMLieh     FINAL1        ;
               +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%»ijahtj%>in             FINAL1        ;
                       +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Inf:%»ijahtj%>edh            FINAL1        ;
                      +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+VGen:%»ijahtj%>en             FINAL1        ;
!                      +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Act:%»ijahtj%>eme            FINAL1        ;
                       +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ger:%»ijahtj%>eminie         FINAL1        ;
                    +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+PrfPrc:%»ijahtj%>eme            FINAL1        ;
                    +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+ConNeg:%»ijahtj%>0h             FINAL1        ;



!LEXICON IV_PASSIVE_S   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ row E - Group V  NB! FOR already derivated PASSIVES!!!
!           +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>oe        FINAL1        ;
!           +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>X2h       FINAL1        ;
!           +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i         FINAL1        ;
!  +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPi FINAL1        ;
!           +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>in        FINAL1        ;
!! Infinite forms
!! --------------
!                   +V+IV+Inf:%>edh       FINAL1        ;
!                  +V+IV+VGen:%>en        FINAL1        ;
!!                  +V+IV+Act:%>eme       FINAL1        ;
!                   +V+IV+Ger:%>eminie    FINAL1        ;
!!               +V+IV+PrsPrc:%>ije       FINAL1        ;
!!               +V+IV+PrsPrc:%>ijes      FINAL1        ;
!                +V+IV+PrfPrc:%>eme       FINAL1        ;
!                +V+IV+ConNeg:%>h         FINAL1        ;
!! Derivations
!! -----------
!       +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»em        flagNomActOdd ;


LEXICON LGIDH  !!≈ * **@CODE@**

! Finite forms
! ------------
           +V+IV+Ind+Prs:%>                VSUF-ODD-PRS   ;
           +V+IV+Ind+Prt:%>                VSUF-ODD-PRT   ;
             +V+IV+Imprt:%>                VSUF-ODD-IMP   ;

! Infinite forms
! --------------
               +V+IV+Inf:%>idh             FINAL1         ;
            +V+IV+ConNeg:%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1         ;
              +V+IV+VGen:%>%^DISIMPen      FINAL1         ; ! = GH Modalis, KB måtesform, GH Voluntativ
!              +V+IV+Act:%>immie           FINAL1         ; ! = GH verbalsubst, KB nomen actionis
               +V+IV+Ger:%>%^DISIMPeminie  FINAL1         ; ! = GH Gerundium
!           +V+IV+PrsPrc:%>æjja            FINAL1         ; ! = GH Ptz.Pr. => must go to nominal lexicon instead
            +V+IV+PrfPrc:%>amme            FINAL1         ; ! = GH Ptz.Pt.
!   GH Ptz.Fut. b'ïssejässaa missing here

!           +V+IV+VAbess:%>h               FINAL1         ;
! On the issue on a possible Verbal abessive (karitiv), cf Hasselbrink:
! GH s. 139, V-Adj: präd -k(e)h , attr -k(e)s
! äbrekh ohne zu regnen
! äbreks der nicht regnet
! baal'eks der nicht gräbt
! b'üdnekh ungezwirnt
! vädd'ekh ungegeben, ohne zu geben

! Derivations
! -----------
!   +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»æjj@C.NeedNoun@ MAANA          ;
   +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»imm             flagNomActEven ;
  +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»ahtj            AHTJE          ;





!! Nominal derivation sublexica

!LEXICON LAAHKOEH_EVEN   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
!   LAAHKOEH_BE  ;
!   LAAHKOEH_MES ;

!LEXICON LAAHKOEH_BE  !!≈ ** __@CODE@__
! +Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP     FINAL1   ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%>%^DISIMPm  FINAL1   ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%>%^DISIMPn  FINAL1   ;
! +Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP2be%^DISIMP    FINAL1   ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>%^COMPDISIMP2be%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1   ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMP2be%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1   ;
! +Sg+Ill:b%>asse                      FINAL1   ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
! +Sg+Ine:b%>isnie                     FINAL1   ;
! +Sg+Ela:b%>istie                     FINAL1   ;
! +Sg+Com:b%>inie                      FINAL1   ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%>%^DISIMPh   FINAL1   ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%>%^DISIMPh  FINAL1   ;
! +Pl+Acc:b%>idie                      FINAL1   ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%>%^DISIMP    IGENSUFF ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%>%^DISIMP   IGENSUFF ;
! +Pl+Ill:b%>idie                      FINAL1   ;
! +Pl+Ine:b%>inie                      FINAL1   ;
! +Pl+Ela:b%>ijstie                    FINAL1   ;
! +Pl+Com:b%>%^DISIMPigujmie           FINAL1   ;
!    +Ess:b%>inie                      FINAL1   ;
!
!LEXICON LAAHKOEH_MES  !!≈ ** __@CODE@__
! +Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP       FINAL1   ;
! +Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP2mes%^DISIMP      FINAL1   ;
! +Sg+Acc:masse%>m                        FINAL1   ;
! +Sg+Gen:masse%>n                        FINAL1   ;
! +Sg+Ill:masse%>se                       FINAL1   ;
! +Sg+Ine:masse%>sne                      FINAL1   ;
! +Sg+Ela:masse%>ste                      FINAL1   ;
! +Sg+Com:mass%>ine                       FINAL1   ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPmas%>%^DISIMPh    FINAL1   ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP2mas%>%^DISIMPh   FINAL1   ;
! +Pl+Acc:%>mass%>ide                     FINAL1   ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMP%>mass%>%^DISIMP  IGENSUFF ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMP2%>mass%>%^DISIMP IGENSUFF ;
! +Pl+Ill:%>mass%>ide                     FINAL1   ;
! +Pl+Ine:%>mass%>ine                     FINAL1   ;
! +Pl+Ela:%>mass%>ijste                   FINAL1   ;
! +Pl+Com:%>mass%>igujmie                 FINAL1   ;
!    +Ess:mass%>ine                       FINAL1   ;


LEXICON LAAHKOEH_ODD  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
  LAAHKOEH_ÅBPOE ;
  LAAHKOEH_OMMES ;
